Illinois, session 104th, HB3653.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 5Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2HHHH as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 505/2HHHH new)7    Sec. 2HHHH. Automated customer service. A business 8providing customer support that uses an automated telephone 9answering system or an automated text interface that simulates 10conversation shall, during the normal hours of operation of 11the business, provide the customer with the option of 12communicating with a human representative at the beginning of 13the phone call or text interaction.